Oklahoma, session 2026, SB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.21, is
amended to read as follows:

Section 34.21. A. No agency of the executive branch of the
state shall use state funds for or enter into any agreement for the
acquisition, development or enhancement of a communication or
telecommunication system including voice, data, radio, video,
Internet, eGovernment, as referenced in Sections 34.24 and 34.25 of
this title, printers, scanners, copiers, facsimile systems and
associated supplies, service costs, maintenance costs, or any other
costs or fees associated with the acquisition of the system or
equipment, without written authorization of the Chief Information
Officer or a designee. The Chief Information Officer or a designee
shall verify that any acquisition, development or enhancement is
compatible with the operation of the Oklahoma Government
Telecommunications Network.
B. No agency of the executive branch of the state shall enter
into any agreement for the acquisition, development or enhancement
of a communication or telecommunication system or service including
voice, data, radio, video, Internet, eGovernment, printers,
scanners, copiers, and facsimile systems, unless the cost of such
addition, change, improvement or development has been included in
the statewide communications plan of the Information Services
Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, as
said plan may have been amended or revised.
C. State agencies may enter into interagency contracts to share
communications and telecommunications resources for mutually
beneficial purposes. The contract shall clearly state how its
purpose contributes to the development or enhancement or cost
reduction of a state network which includes voice, data, radio,
video, Internet, eGovernment, or facsimile systems. The contract
shall be approved by the Information Services Division before any
payments are made.
D. The provisions of subsections A, B and C of this section
shall not apply to the telecommunications network known as OneNet
whether said network is governed or operated by the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education or any other state entity assigned
responsibility for OneNet.
E. The provisions of this section shall not apply to CompSource
Oklahoma.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 2

F. No state agency shall use state funds or enter into any
agreement for the acquisition, development or enhancement of a
public safety communication system unless the request is consistent
with the Statewide Communications Interoperability Plan and the
public safety communications standards issued by the Oklahoma Office
of Homeland Security. Agencies interested in acquiring, developing
or enhancing a public safety communications system shall submit a
proposal to the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security. The Oklahoma
Office of Homeland Security shall issue a proposal review which
summarizes whether the proposal is consistent with the Statewide
Communications Interoperability Plan and the technology standards
issued. The proposal review shall be submitted to the requesting
agency and to the Chief Information Officer.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.36, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 34.36. A. On the first day of October preceding each
regular session of the Legislature, each state agency, including
those created or established pursuant to constitutional provisions,
shall report to the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services and the Chair and Vice Chair of the Legislative
Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance an itemized request
showing the amount needed for the ensuing fiscal year beginning with
the first day of July.
B. The forms which must be used in making these reports shall
be approved by the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services and the Legislative Oversight Committee on State
Budget Performance.
C. The forms shall be uniform, and shall clearly designate the
information to be given.
D. The information provided shall include, but not be limited
to:
1. A budget analysis of existing and proposed programs
utilizing performance-informed budgeting techniques. Such analysis
shall be included as a part of the estimate of funds needed;
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 3

2. A statement listing any other state, federal or local
agencies which administer a similar or cooperating program and an
outline of the interaction among such agencies;
3. A statement of the statutory authority for the missions and
quantified objectives of each program;
4. A description of the groups of people served by each program
in the agency;
5. A quantification of the need for the program;
6. A description of the tactics which are intended to
accomplish each objective;
7. A list of quantifiable program outcomes which measure the
efficiency and effectiveness of each program;
8. A ranking of these programs by priority;
9. Actual program expenditures for the current fiscal year and
prior fiscal years and the number of personnel required to
accomplish each program;
10. Revenues expected to be generated by each program, if any;
11. With respect to appropriated state agencies, a detailed
listing of all employees and resources dedicated to the provision of
financial services including but not limited to procurement,
payroll, accounts receivable and accounts payable. The provisions
of this paragraph shall not be applicable to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education or to any institutions within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education; and
12. A certification that following the effective date of this
act and prior to July 1, 2011, no expenditure shall have been made
or funds encumbered for the purchase, lease, lease-purchase or
rental of any computers, software, telecom, information technology
hardware, firmware or information technology services, including
support services without the prior written approval of the State
Comptroller or his or her designee.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 4

E. These appropriated agencies shall make an itemized estimate
of needs for the ensuing fiscal year and the following two (2)
fiscal years and request for funds for the ensuing fiscal year and
an estimate of the revenues from all sources to be received by the
agency during the ensuing fiscal year and the following two (2)
fiscal years.
F. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall submit to the Governor and the Legislative Oversight
Committee on State Budget Performance no later than the fifth day of
October a complete list of all spending agencies which have failed
to submit budgets by October 1.
G. The reports required by this section shall include an
itemized listing of outstanding capital lease debt and estimated
capital lease needs for the ensuing fiscal year and the following
two (2) fiscal years, and shall be provided on forms prescribed by
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
H. For the purposes of this section, “capital lease” means a
lease-purchase agreement which provides an option for the State of
Oklahoma or its agencies to purchase property, including personal
and real property, which is the subject thereof and/or a lease
agreement that provides an option for the State of Oklahoma or its
agencies to lease such property, which is the subject thereof, at a
nominal annual amount, after a period in which leased property is
rented at fair market value.
I. The provisions of this section shall not apply to CompSource
Oklahoma if CompSource Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot
program authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
J. Not later than January 1, the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall publish a shared services
cost-performance assessment report documenting the amount of each
state agency’s cost for providing shared services. The lowest
ranking state agencies shall enter into a contract with the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services for the provision of shared
financial services, provided that the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services determines that implementation of
such a contract would be feasible and documents that the contractual
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 5

agreement will result in cost savings or efficiencies to the state.
Contracts required by this subsection shall be entered into at the
start of the next fiscal year. When a state agency is contracted
with the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for the
provision of shared financial services, the agency may discontinue
using shared services when documentation showing that the agency can
provide the services at a lower cost to the state is provided to and
approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services. As used in this subsection, “shared services” means
process, resource utilization or action as defined by administrative
rule. On a yearly basis the Director of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services shall compile and publish a report
documenting the cost savings resulting from shared services
contracts. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
applicable to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or to
any institutions within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.42, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 113, O.S.L. 2024 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 34.42), is amended to read as follows:
Section 34.42. A. On or before the first day of June in each
year, or as soon thereafter as possible, all agencies shall file
agency budgets with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services. Copies of all agency budgets shall also be
made available electronically to the staff of the Joint Legislative
Committee on Budget and Program Oversight.
B. The required instructions, content and format of agency
budgets shall be developed by the staff of the Budget Division of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
C. 1. The agency budget shall include a description of all
funds available to the agency for expenditure and set out allotments
requested by the agency by quarter and the entire fiscal year.
2. The agency budget shall be accompanied by an organizational
chart of the agency, a statement of agency mission and program
objectives.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 6

3. The agency budget shall delineate agency spending by such
categories and with at least as much detail as is specified in the
legislative appropriation and as prescribed by the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
4. Agency budgets shall be signed by the executive officer of
each agency.
5. The executive officer shall certify that the agency is in
complete compliance with the requirements of Section 34.11.3 of this
title and Section 3-114 of Title 65 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. A “request officer” shall be designated by each state agency
for the purpose of making program and allotment requests.
E. Executive officers of agencies shall cooperate with the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services staff and Joint
Committee staff in developing program budgeting categories.
F. All funds available or expected to be made available to any
agency, including nonfiscal appropriations, shall not be available
for expenditure until the request officer of the agency has complied
with the applicable provisions of the Oklahoma State Finance Act and
has received approval of such request for funds from the Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
G. The provisions of this section shall not apply to CompSource
Oklahoma if CompSource Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot
program authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 45.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 45.2. In this act, “state agency” means a department,
board, commission, or other entity of state government within the
Executive Department of the State of Oklahoma, including
institutions of higher education, that:
1. Was created by the Constitution or a state statute with an
ongoing mission and responsibilities;
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 7

2. Is not the Office of the Governor or Lieutenant Governor;
and
3. Is not a committee created under state law whose primary
function is to advise an agency; and
4. Is not CompSource Oklahoma, provided CompSource Oklahoma is
operating pursuant to a pilot program authorized pursuant to
Sections 1 and 2 of this act.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 18c, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 18c. A. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this
subsection, no state officer, board or commission shall have
authority to employ or appoint attorneys to advise or represent said
officer, board or commission in any matter.
2. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the
Corporation Commission, the Council on Law Enforcement Education and
Training, the Consumer Credit Commission, the Board of Managers of
the State Insurance Fund, the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the
Commissioners of the Land Office, the Oklahoma Public Welfare
Commission also known as the Commission for Human Services, the
State Board of Corrections, the Oklahoma Health Care Authority, the
Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics
and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement
Commission, the Transportation Commission, the Oklahoma Energy
Resources Board, the Oklahoma Merit Protection Commission, the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services, the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board, the Department of Labor, the Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, the Northeast Oklahoma Public
Facilities Authority, the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and
Retirement System, the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,
the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma
Conservation Commission, the Office of Juvenile Affairs, the State
Board of Pharmacy and the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs.
3. The provisions of paragraph 2 of this subsection shall not
be construed to authorize the Office of Juvenile Affairs to employ
any attorneys that are not specifically authorized by law.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 8

4. All the legal duties of such officer, board or commission
shall devolve upon and are hereby vested in the Attorney General;
provided that:
a. the Governor shall have authority to employ special
counsel to protect the rights or interest of the state
as provided in Section 6 of this title, and
b. liquidation agents of banks shall have the authority
to employ local counsel, with the consent of the Bank
Commissioner and the Attorney General and the approval
of the district court.
B. At the request of any state officer, board or commission,
except the Corporation Commission, the Board of Managers of the
CompSource Oklahoma, Oklahoma Tax Commission and the Commissioners
of the Land Office, the Grand River Dam Authority, the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Oklahoma Firefighters
Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System, the Uniform Retirement System for Justices and
Judges and the Interstate Oil and Gas Compact Commission, the
Attorney General shall defend any action in which they may be sued
in their official capacity. At the request of any such state
officer, board or commission, the Attorney General shall have
authority to institute suits in the name of the State of Oklahoma on
their relation, if after investigation the Attorney General is
convinced there is sufficient legal merit to justify the action.
C. Any officer, board or commission which has the authority to
employ or appoint attorneys may request that the Attorney General
defend any action arising pursuant to the provisions of The
Governmental Tort Claims Act.
D. C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal or
affect the provisions of the statutes of this state pertaining to
attorneys and legal advisors of the several commissions and
departments of state specified in subsection B of this section, and
all acts and parts of acts pertaining thereto shall be and remain in
full force and effect.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 9

SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 62.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 62.3. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall promulgate rules for use by state agencies
and the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to dispose of
surplus property. The rules shall include standards for
recordkeeping, methods for removal or disposal of surplus property,
and acquisition by state agencies and authorized entities of surplus
property, and for Office management of surplus property programs.
B. A state agency selling, trading, redistributing or otherwise
disposing of surplus property shall comply with the rules
promulgated by the Director.
C. The Office shall make surplus property available to state
agencies and authorized entities, which shall include political
subdivisions, school districts, and nonprofit entities of this
state.
D. The provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus Property Act shall
not apply to institutions of higher education in this state, the
Oklahoma Historical Society, the University Hospitals Authority or
University Hospitals Trust or the Northeast Oklahoma Public
Facilities Authority. The Grand River Dam Authority shall be exempt
from the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus Property Act for any
surplus property disposed of prior to November 1, 2006. CompSource
Oklahoma shall be exempt from the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus
Property Act if CompSource Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot
program authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of this title.
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Oklahoma Surplus
Property Act, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation may,
pursuant to rules promulgated by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation Commission for that purpose, donate any surplus
property, as defined in Section 62.2 of this title, to any law
enforcement agency of any political subdivision of the State of
Oklahoma. The use of such donated equipment shall be limited to
valid and authorized law enforcement efforts by the receiving
agency.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 10

SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 63, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 63. A. The Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall have power to promulgate rules not inconsistent with
the laws of this state.
B. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall have
charge of the construction, repair, maintenance, insurance, and
operation of all buildings owned, used, or occupied by or on behalf
of the state including buildings owned by the Oklahoma Capitol
Improvement Authority where such services are carried out by
contract with the Authority, except as otherwise provided by law.
Whenever feasible, the Office of Management and Enterprise Services
may utilize the Construction Division of the Department of
Corrections for the construction and repair of buildings for the
Department of Corrections.
C. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall have authority to purchase all material and perform
all other duties necessary in the construction, repair, and
maintenance of all buildings under its management or control, shall
make all necessary contracts by or on behalf of the state for any
buildings or rooms rented for the use of the state or any of the
officers thereof, and shall have charge of the arrangement and
allotment of space in such buildings among the different state
officers except as otherwise provided by law.
D. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall not
have any authority or responsibility for buildings, rooms or space
under the management or control of the University Hospitals
Authority.
E. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall have
the custody and control of all state property, and all other
property managed or used by the state, except military stores and
such property under the control of the State Banking Department and
the two houses of the State Legislature, shall procure all necessary
insurance thereon against loss and shall allot the use of the
property to the several offices of the state, and prescribe where
the property shall be kept for public use.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 11

F. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall keep
an accurate account of all property purchased for the state or any
of the departments or officers thereof, except that purchased for
and by the two houses of the State Legislature. The two houses
shall have the exclusive use, care, and custody of their respective
chambers, committee rooms, furniture, and property, and shall keep
their respective records of said furniture and property.
G. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall not
have any authority or responsibility for property purchased for or
under the management or control of the University Hospitals
Authority except as expressly provided by law.
H. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall not
have any authority or responsibility for property purchased for or
under the management or control of CompSource Oklahoma if CompSource
Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot program authorized by
Sections 3316 and 3317 of this title.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 78a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 78a. A. State agencies with authority to own motor
vehicles shall submit a requisition to the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services prior to acquisition of a motor
vehicle. The requisition shall state the type of vehicle, the
intended purpose of the vehicle, a statement that the agency has
actual need for the vehicle, the supplier of the vehicle, that the
state agency has sufficient funds to acquire and maintain the
vehicle and cite the statutory authority of the state agency to
acquire a vehicle.
B. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall review the requisition and approve or deny the
request of the state agency within fifteen (15) days of receipt.
C. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall
not apply to the Department of Public Safety, the Commissioners of
the Land Office, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and
Dangerous Drugs Control or the Oklahoma Military Department.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 12

D. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall
not apply to CompSource Oklahoma if CompSource Oklahoma is operating
pursuant to a pilot program authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of
this title.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 78b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 78b. A. A state agency shall notify the Fleet
Management Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services not less than thirty (30) days prior to any vehicle
disposal by the state agency.
B. A state agency shall not dispose of a passenger car, truck,
pickup, or other vehicle the state agency owns until it has been in
use for sixty thousand (60,000) miles or at least twenty-four (24)
months have elapsed since the day the claim was approved for the
payment thereof, unless the vehicle has damage and repairs that will
exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), or the
Director of the Fleet Management Division of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services provides written authorization
for disposal.
C. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall
not apply to the Commissioners of the Land Office, the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma or CompSource Oklahoma if
CompSource Oklahoma is operating pursuant to a pilot program
authorized by Sections 3316 and 3317 of this title.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 85A O.S. 2021, Section 17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 17. A. There is hereby created a Physician Advisory
Committee comprised of nine (9) members to be appointed as follows:
1. The Governor shall appoint three members, one of whom shall
be licensed in this state as a doctor of medicine and surgery, one
of whom shall be engaged in the practice of family medicine in a
rural community of the state, and one of whom shall be an
osteopathic physician;
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 13

2. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint three
members, one of whom shall be licensed in this state as a doctor of
medicine and orthopedic surgery, one of whom shall be licensed in
this state either as a doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy
and a neurosurgeon, and one of whom shall be licensed in this state
as a podiatric physician; and
3. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint
three members, one of whom shall be licensed in this state as an
osteopathic physician, one of whom shall be licensed in this state
either as a doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy and shall
be engaged in the practice of occupational medicine, and one of whom
shall be licensed in this state as a chiropractic physician.
Any member serving on the effective date of this section shall
serve the remainder of his or her term. Thereafter, each position
will be filled by the appointing official for a term of three (3)
years. Members shall be subject to reappointment, with any new
appointee to serve out the remainder of the unexpired term of the
Committee member so replaced.
B. The Committee shall:
1. Assist and advise the Workers’ Compensation Commission
regarding utilization review as it relates to the medical practice
and treatment of work-related injuries. Such utilization review
shall include a review of reasonable and necessary medical
treatment; abusive practices; needless treatments, testing, or
procedures; or a pattern of billing in excess of or in violation of
the Schedule of Medical Fees. The Physician Advisory Committee
shall review and make findings and recommendations to the Commission
with respect to charges of inappropriate or unnecessary treatment or
procedures, abusive practices, or excessive billing disclosed
through utilization review;
2. Assist the Commission in reviewing medical practices of
health care providers, including evaluations of permanent disability
provided by health care providers. The Committee shall review and
make findings and recommendations to the Commission with respect to
charges of abusive practices by health care providers providing
medical services or evaluations of permanent partial disability
through the workers’ compensation system;
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 14

3. After public hearing, review and make recommendations for
acceptable deviations from the American Medical Association’s
“Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment”;
4. After public hearing, adopt Physician Advisory Committee
Guidelines (PACG) and protocols for only medical treatment not
addressed by the latest edition of the Official Disability
Guidelines;
5. After public hearing, adopt Physician Advisory Committee
Guidelines for the prescription and dispensing of any controlled
substance included in Schedule II of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act if not addressed by the current edition of
the Official Disability Guidelines;
6. Review utilization on cases or of providers when requested
by any employer, injured employee or insurer. The Committee may
issue a public or private censure to any provider for utilization
which is excessive or inadequate, or recommend the Commission order
treatment within the treatment guidelines;
7. Provide general recommendations to the Commission on the
issues of injury causation and apportionment;
8. Conduct educational seminars for the Commission, employers,
employees, and other interested parties;
9. Assist the Commission in accessing medical information from
scientific literature; and
10. Report its progress annually to the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
C. The Commission shall recognize the latest edition of the
Official Disability Guidelines as the primary standard of reference,
at the time of treatment, in determining the frequency and extent of
services presumed to be medically necessary and appropriate for
compensable injuries under this act, or in resolving such matters in
the event a dispute arises.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 15

D. Members of the Physician Advisory Committee shall receive no
compensation for serving on the Committee but shall be reimbursed by
the Commission for their necessary travel expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties in accordance with the State Travel
Reimbursement Act.
E. Meetings of the Physician Advisory Committee shall be called
by the Commission but held at least quarterly. The presence of a
majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. No action shall
be taken by the Physician Advisory Committee without the affirmative
vote of at least a majority of the members.
F. The Commission shall provide office supplies and personnel
of the Commission to assist the Committee in the performance of its
duties.
G. Upon written request, the Insurance Commissioner, CompSource
Oklahoma Mutual Insurance Company, and every approved self-insured
employer in Oklahoma shall provide the Committee with data necessary
to the performance of its duties.
H. Any health care provider acting in good faith and within the
scope of the provider’s duties as a member of the Physician Advisory
Committee shall be immune from civil liability for making any report
or other information available to the judges of the Commission or to
the Commission or for assisting in the origination, investigation,
or preparation of the report or other information so provided.
SECTION 11. REPEALER 36 O.S. 2021, Section 902.3, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 12. REPEALER 74 O.S. 2021, Sections 3316 and
3317, are hereby repealed.
SECTION 13. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 16

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 494 Page 17